Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.491

Licenses—Money deposited in the agricultural local fund.

All moneys received for licenses under this chapter shall be deposited in the agricultural local fund established under RCW 43.23.230.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 27 s 4; 2005 c 414 s 4; 1999 c 291 s 23; 1961 c 11 s 15.32.710. Prior: 1899 c 43 s 27; RRS s 6249. Formerly RCW 15.32.710.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 27: See note following RCW 15.36.051.

Effective date—2005 c 414 ss 1 and 4: See note following RCW 15.36.051.